North Dakota, session 69, SB2109.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Section 65-01-02 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
65-01-02. Definitions. (Effective through August 31, 2028)
In this title:
1. "Acute care" means a short course of intensive diagnostic and therapeutic services provided
immediately following a work injury with a rapid onset of pronounced symptoms.
2. "Adopted" or "adoption" refers only to a legal adoption effected prior to the time of the injury.
3. "Allied health care professional" includes a health care provider, pharmacist, audiologist,
speech language pathologist, or naturopath or any recognized practitioner who provides
skilled services pursuant to the prescription of, or under the supervision or direction of any of
these individuals.
4. "Artificial members" includes a device that is a substitute for a natural part, organ, limb, or
other part of the body. The term includes a prescriptive device that is an aid for a natural part,
organ, limb, or other part of the body if the damage to the prescriptive device is accompanied
by an injury to the body. A prescriptive device includes prescription eyeglasses, contact
lenses, dental braces, and orthopedic braces.
5. "Artificial replacements" means mechanical aids, including braces, belts, casts, or crutches as
may be reasonable and necessary due to compensable injury.
6. "Average weekly wage" means the weekly wages the injured employee was receiving from all
employments for which coverage is required or otherwise secured at the date of first disability.
The average weekly wage determined under this subsection must be rounded to the nearest
dollar. If the injured employee's wages are not fixed by the week, they must be determined by
using the first applicable formula from the schedule below:
a. For seasonal employment, during the first consecutive days of disability up to
twenty-eight days the average weekly wage is calculated pursuant to the first applicable
formula in subdivisions b through g, and after that are calculated as one-fiftieth of the
total wages from all occupations during the twelve months preceding the date of first
disability or during the tax year preceding the date of first disability, or an average of the
three tax years preceding the date of first disability, whichever is highest and for which
accurate, reliable, and complete records are readily available.
b. The "average weekly wage" of a self-employed employer is determined by the following
formula: one fifty-second of the average annual net self-employed earnings reported the

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 2
three preceding tax years or preceding fifty-two weeks whichever is higher if accurate,
reliable, and complete records for those fifty-two weeks are readily available.
c. Hourly or daily rate multiplied by number of hours or days worked per seven-day week.
d. Monthly rate multiplied by twelve months and divided by fifty-two weeks.
e. Biweekly rate divided by two.
f. The usual wage paid other employees engaged in similar occupations.
g. A wage reasonably and fairly approximating the weekly wage lost by the injured
employee during the period of disability.
7. "Average weekly wage in the state" means the determination made of the average weekly
wage in the state by job service North Dakota on or before July first of each year, computed to
the next highest dollar.
8. "Board" means the workforce safety and insurance board of directors.
9. "Brother" and "sister" include a stepbrother and a stepsister, a half brother and a half sister,
and a brother and sister by adoption. The terms do not include a married brother or sister
unless that person actually is dependent.
10. "Child", for determining eligibility for benefits under chapter 65-05, means a legitimate child, a
stepchild, adopted child, posthumous child, foster child, and acknowledged illegitimate child
who is under eighteen years of age and resides with the injured employee; or is under
eighteen years of age and does not reside with the injured employee but a duty of support is
substantiated by an appropriate court order; or is between eighteen and twenty-two years of
age and enrolled as a full-time student in any accredited educational institution and dependent
upon the injured employee for support; or is eighteen years of age or over and is physically or
mentally incapable of self-support and is actually dependent upon the injured employee for
support. A child does not include a married child unless actually dependent on the injured
employee as shown on the preceding year's income tax returns.
11. "Compensable injury" means an injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
hazardous employment which must be established by medical evidence supported by
objective medical findings.
a. The term includes:
(1) Disease caused by a hazard to which an employee is subjected in the course of
employment. The disease must be incidental to the character of the business and
not independent of the relation of employer and employee. Disease includes effects
from radiation.
(2) An injury to artificial members.
(3) Injuries due to heart attack or other heart-related disease, stroke, and physical
injury caused by mental stimulus, but only when caused by the employee's
employment with reasonable medical certainty, and only when it is determined with
reasonable medical certainty that unusual stress is at least fifty percent of the cause
of the injury or disease as compared with all other contributing causes combined.
Unusual stress means stress greater than the highest level of stress normally
experienced or anticipated in that position or line of work.
(4) Injuries arising out of employer-required or supplied travel to and from a remote
jobsite or activities performed at the direction or under the control of the employer.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 3
(5) An injury caused by the willful act of a third person directed against an employee
because of the employee's employment.
(6) A mental or psychological condition that is physiologically caused by a physical
injury, but only when the physical injury is determined with reasonable medical
certainty to be at least fifty percent of the cause of the condition as compared with
all other contributing causes combined, and only when the condition did not
pre-exist the work injury. Other contributing causes include emotional circumstances
that generally accompany work - related injuries, including the loss of function, loss o f
sel f - esteem, loss of financial independence, divorce, loss of career or employmen t
position, disruption of lifestyle or family units, anxiousness, uncertainty, or
compromised ability to participate in a lifestyle, hobby, or pastime.
b. The term does not include:
(1) Ordinary diseases of life to which the general public outside of employment is
exposed or preventive treatment for communicable diseases, except the
organization may pay for preventive treatment for an exposure to a bloodborne
pathogen as defined in section 23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment
and for exposure to rabies occurring in the course of employment.
(2) A willfully self-inflicted injury, including suicide or attempted suicide, or an injury
caused by the employee's willful intention to injure or kill another.
(3) Any injury caused by the use of intoxicants, including recreational marijuana use, or
the illegal use of controlled substances.
(4) An injury that arises out of an altercation in which the injured employee is an
aggressor. This paragraph does not apply to public safety employees, including law
enforcement officers or private security personnel who are required to engage in
altercations as part of their job duties if the altercation arises out of the performance
of those job duties.
(5) An injury that arises out of an illegal act committed by the injured employee.
(6) An injury that arises out of an employee's voluntary nonpaid participation in any
recreational activity, including athletic events, parties, and picnics, even though the
employer pays some or all of the cost of the activity.
(7) Injuries attributable to a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, including
when the employment acts as a trigger to produce symptoms in the pre-existing
injury, disease, or other condition unless the employment substantially accelerates
its progression or substantially worsens its severity. Pain is a symptom and may be
considered in determining whether there is a substantial acceleration or substantial
worsening of a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, but pain alone is not a
substantial acceleration or a substantial worsening.
(8) A nonemployment injury that, although acting upon a prior compensable injury, is an
independent intervening cause of injury.
(9) A latent or asymptomatic degenerative condition, caused in substantial part by
employment duties, which is triggered or made active by a subsequent injury.
(10) A mental injury arising from mental stimulus.
12. "Date of first disability" means the first date the injured employee was unable to work because
of a compensable injury.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 4
13. "Date of maximum medical improvement" or "date of maximum medical recovery" means the
date after which further recovery from, or lasting improvement to, an injury or disease can no
longer reasonably be anticipated based upon reasonable medical probability.
14. "Director" means the director of the organization.
15. "Disability" means loss of actual earnings capacity and may be permanent total, temporary
total, or partial.
16. "Electronic means" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless,
optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.
17. "Employee" means an individual who performs hazardous employment for another for
remuneration unless the individual is an independent contractor under the common-law test.
a. The term includes:
(1) All elective and appointed officials of this state and its political subdivisions,
including municipal corporations and including the members of the legislative
assembly, all elective officials of any county, and all elective peace officers of any
city.
(2) Aliens.
(3) Human service zone general assistance workers, except those who are engaged in
repaying to human service zones or the department of health and human services
moneys the human service zones or the department of health and human services
have been compelled by statute to expend for general assistance.
(4) Minors, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed. A minor is deemed sui juris for the
purposes of this title, and no other person has any claim for relief or right to claim
workforce safety and insurance benefits for any injury to a minor worker, but in the
event of the award of a lump sum of benefits to a minor employee, the lump sum
may be paid only to the legally appointed guardian of the minor.
b. The term does not include:
(1) An individual whose employment is both casual and not in the course of the trade,
business, profession, or occupation of that individual's employer.
(2) An individual who is engaged in an illegal enterprise or occupation.
(3) The spouse of an employer or the child under the age of twenty-two of an employer.
For purposes of this paragraph and section 65-07-01, "child" means any legitimate
child, stepchild, adopted child, foster child, or acknowledged illegitimate child.
(4) A real estate broker or real estate salesperson, provided the individual meets the
following three requirements:
(a) The salesperson or broker must be a licensed real estate agent under section
43-23-05.
(b) Substantially all of the salesperson's or broker's remuneration for the services
performed as a real estate agent must be directly related to sales or other
efforts rather than to the number of hours worked.
(c) A written agreement must exist between the salesperson or broker and the
person for which the salesperson or broker works, which agreement must

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 5
provide the salesperson or broker will not be treated as an employee but
rather as an independent contractor.
(5) The members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not
employed in any capacity by the corporation other than as members of the board of
directors.
(6) An individual delivering newspapers or shopping news, if substantially all of the
individual's remuneration is directly related to sales or other efforts rather than to the
number of hours worked and a written agreement exists between the individual and
the publisher of the newspaper or shopping news which states the individual is an
independent contractor.
(7) An employer.
(8) An athlete participating in a contact sport. As used in this paragraph, "contact sport"
means a team or individual competitive athletic activity that includes significant
physical contact between the athletes involved. The term includes football and
hockey.
17.18. "Employer" means a person that engages or received the services of another for remuneration
unless the person performing the services is an independent contractor under the
common-law test. The term includes:
a. The state and all political subdivisions thereof.
b. All public and quasi-public corporations in this state.
c. Every person, partnership, limited liability company, association, and private corporation,
including a public service corporation.
d. The legal representative of any deceased employer.
e. The receiver or trustee of any person, partnership, limited liability company, association,
or corporation having one or more employees as herein defined.
f. The president, vice presidents, secretary, or treasurer of a business corporation, but not
members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not also officers of
the corporation.
g. The managers of a limited liability company.
h. The president, vice presidents, secretary, treasurer, or board of directors of an
association or cooperative organized under chapter 6-06, 10-12, 10-13, 10-15, 36-08, or
49-21.
i. The clerk, assessor, treasurer, or any member of the board of supervisors of an
organized township, if the person is not employed by the township in any other capacity.
j. A multidistrict special education unit.
k. An area career and technology center.
l. A regional education association.
18.19. "Fee schedule" means the payment formulas established in the organization publication
entitled "Medical and Hospital Fees".
19.20. "Fund" means the workforce safety and insurance fund.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 6
20.21. "Hazardous employment" means any employment in which one or more employees are
employed regularly in the same business or in or about the establishment except:
a. Agricultural or domestic service.
b. Any employment of a common carrier by railroad.
c. Any employment for the transportation of property or persons by nonresidents, where, in
such transportation, the highways are not traveled more than seven miles [11.27
kilometers] and return over the same route within the state of North Dakota.
d. All members of the clergy and employees of religious organizations engaged in the
operation, maintenance, and conduct of the place of worship.
21.22. "Health care provider" means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy, chiropractor, dentist,
optometrist, podiatrist, or psychologist acting within the scope of the doctor's license, a
physical therapist, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a certified physician assistant.
22.23. "Medical marijuana" means the use of all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, the seeds
of the plant, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, the seeds of the plant, or the resin
extracted from any part of the plant as a physician-recommended form of medicine or herbal
therapy. The term does not include treatments or preparations specifically approved by the
United States food and drug administration as a drug product.
23.24. "Noncompliance" means failure to follow the requirements of chapter 65-04. An employer may
be in noncompliance regardless of the employer's insured or uninsured status with the
organization.
24.25. "Organization" means workforce safety and insurance, or the director, or any department
head, assistant, or employee of workforce safety and insurance designated by the director, to
act within the course and scope of that person's employment in administering the policies,
powers, and duties of this title.
25.26. "Parent" includes a stepparent and a parent by adoption.
26.27. "Payroll report" means the mechanism created by the organization and used by employers to
report all employee payroll required by the organization.
27.28. "Permanent impairment" means the loss of or loss of use of a member of the body existing
after the date of maximum medical improvement and includes disfigurement resulting from an
injury.
28.29. "Permanent total disability" means disability that is the direct result of a compensable injury
that prevents an injured employee from performing any work and results from any one of the
following conditions:
a. Total and permanent loss of sight of both eyes;
b. Loss of both legs or loss of both feet at or above the ankle;
c. Loss of both arms or loss of both hands at or above the wrist;
d. Loss of any two of the members or faculties in subdivision a, b, or c;
e. Permanent and complete paralysis of both legs or both arms or of one leg and one arm;
f. Third-degree burns that cover at least forty percent of the body and require grafting;

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 7
g. A medically documented brain injury affecting cognitive and mental functioning which
renders an injured employee unable to provide self-care and requires supervision or
assistance with a majority of the activities of daily living; or
h. A compensable injury that results in a permanent partial impairment rating of the whole
body of at least twenty-five percent pursuant to section 65-05-12.2.
If the injured employee has not reached maximum medical improvement within one hundred
four weeks, the injured employee may receive a permanent partial impairment rating if a rating
will assist the organization in assessing the injured employee's capabilities. Entitlement to a
rating is solely within the discretion of the organization.
29.30. "Rehabilitation services" means nonmedical services reasonably necessary to restore a
disabled employee to substantial gainful employment as defined by section 65-05.1-01 as
near as possible. The term may include vocational evaluation, counseling, education,
workplace modification, vocational retraining including training for alternative employment with
the same employer, and job placement assistance.
30.31. "Seasonal employment" includes occupations that are not permanent or that do not
customarily operate throughout the entire year. Seasonal employment is determined by what
is customary with respect to the employer at the time of injury.
31.32. "Spouse" includes only the decedent's husband or wife who was living with the decedent or
was dependent upon the decedent for support at the time of injury.
32.33. "Subcontractor" means a person that agrees to perform all or part of the work for a contractor
or another subcontractor.
33.34. "Temporary total disability" means disability that results in the inability of an injured employee
to earn wages as a result of a compensable injury for which disability benefits may not exceed
a cumulative total of one hundred four weeks or the date the injured employee reaches
maximum medical improvement or maximum medical recovery, whichever occurs first.
34.35. "Uninsured" means failure of an employer to secure mandatory coverage with the organization
or failure to pay premium, assessment, penalty, or interest, as calculated by the organization,
which is more than forty-five days past due. An uninsured employer is subject to chapter
65-09.
35.36. "Utilization review" means the initial and continuing evaluation of appropriateness in terms of
both the level and the quality of health care and health services provided a patient, based on
medically accepted standards. The evaluation must be accomplished by means of a system
that identifies the utilization of medical services, based on medically accepted standards, and
which refers instances of possible inappropriate utilization to the organization to obtain
opinions and recommendations of expert medical consultants to review individual cases for
which administrative action may be deemed necessary.
36.37. "Valid functional capacities examination" means:
a. The results of a physical examination consisting of a battery of standardized
assessments that offer reliable results in performance-based measures and demonstrate
the level and duration an injured employee may return to work.
b. The conclusions of medical experts, following observations of other activities the medical
expert determines similarly predictive, when the results of the physical examination in
subdivision a are not obtained or reliable.
37.38. a. "Wages" means:

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 8
(1) An injured employee's remuneration from all employment reportable to the internal
revenue service as earned income for federal income tax purposes.
(2) For members of the national guard who sustain a compensable injury while on state
active duty, "wages" includes income from federal employment and may be included
in determining the average weekly wage.
(3) For purposes of chapter 65-04 only, "wages" means all gross earnings of all
employees. The term includes all pretax deductions for amounts allocated by the
employee for deferred compensation, medical reimbursement, retirement, or any
similar program, but may not include dismissal or severance pay.
b. The organization may consider postinjury wages for which coverage was not required or
otherwise secured in North Dakota for purposes of determining appropriate vocational
rehabilitation options or entitlement to disability benefits under this title.
Definitions. (Effective after August 31, 2028)
In this title:
1. "Acute care" means a short course of intensive diagnostic and therapeutic services provided
immediately following a work injury with a rapid onset of pronounced symptoms.
2. "Adopted" or "adoption" refers only to a legal adoption effected prior to the time of the injury.
3. "Allied health care professional" includes a health care provider, pharmacist, audiologist,
speech language pathologist, or naturopath or any recognized practitioner who provides
skilled services pursuant to the prescription of, or under the supervision or direction of any of
these individuals.
4. "Artificial members" includes a device that is a substitute for a natural part, organ, limb, or
other part of the body. The term includes a prescriptive device that is an aid for a natural part,
organ, limb, or other part of the body if the damage to the prescriptive device is accompanied
by an injury to the body. A prescriptive device includes prescription eyeglasses, contact
lenses, dental braces, and orthopedic braces.
5. "Artificial replacements" means mechanical aids, including braces, belts, casts, or crutches as
may be reasonable and necessary due to compensable injury.
6. "Average weekly wage" means the weekly wages the injured employee was receiving from all
employments for which coverage is required or otherwise secured at the date of first disability.
The average weekly wage determined under this subsection must be rounded to the nearest
dollar. If the injured employee's wages are not fixed by the week, they must be determined by
using the first applicable formula from the schedule below:
a. For seasonal employment, during the first consecutive days of disability up to
twenty-eight days the average weekly wage is calculated pursuant to the first applicable
formula in subdivisions b through g, and after that are calculated as one-fiftieth of the
total wages from all occupations during the twelve months preceding the date of first
disability or during the tax year preceding the date of first disability, or an average of the
three tax years preceding the date of first disability, whichever is highest and for which
accurate, reliable, and complete records are readily available.
b. The "average weekly wage" of a self-employed employer is determined by the following
formula: one fifty-second of the average annual net self-employed earnings reported the
three preceding tax years or preceding fifty-two weeks whichever is higher if accurate,
reliable, and complete records for those fifty-two weeks are readily available.
c. Hourly or daily rate multiplied by number of hours or days worked per seven-day week.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 9
d. Monthly rate multiplied by twelve months and divided by fifty-two weeks.
e. Biweekly rate divided by two.
f. The usual wage paid other employees engaged in similar occupations.
g. A wage reasonably and fairly approximating the weekly wage lost by the injured
employee during the period of disability.
7. "Average weekly wage in the state" means the determination made of the average weekly
wage in the state by job service North Dakota on or before July first of each year, computed to
the next highest dollar.
8. "Board" means the workforce safety and insurance board of directors.
9. "Brother" and "sister" include a stepbrother and a stepsister, a half brother and a half sister,
and a brother and sister by adoption. The terms do not include a married brother or sister
unless that person actually is dependent.
10. "Child", for determining eligibility for benefits under chapter 65-05, means a legitimate child, a
stepchild, adopted child, posthumous child, foster child, and acknowledged illegitimate child
who is under eighteen years of age and resides with the injured employee; or is under
eighteen years of age and does not reside with the injured employee but a duty of support is
substantiated by an appropriate court order; or is between eighteen and twenty-two years of
age and enrolled as a full-time student in any accredited educational institution and dependent
upon the injured employee for support; or is eighteen years of age or over and is physically or
mentally incapable of self-support and is actually dependent upon the injured employee for
support. A child does not include a married child unless actually dependent on the injured
employee as shown on the preceding year's income tax returns.
11. "Compensable injury" means an injury by accident arising out of and in the course of
hazardous employment which must be established by medical evidence supported by
objective medical findings.
a. The term includes:
(1) Disease caused by a hazard to which an employee is subjected in the course of
employment. The disease must be incidental to the character of the business and
not independent of the relation of employer and employee. Disease includes effects
from radiation.
(2) An injury to artificial members.
(3) Injuries due to heart attack or other heart-related disease, stroke, and physical
injury caused by mental stimulus, but only when caused by the employee's
employment with reasonable medical certainty, and only when it is determined with
reasonable medical certainty that unusual stress is at least fifty percent of the cause
of the injury or disease as compared with all other contributing causes combined.
Unusual stress means stress greater than the highest level of stress normally
experienced or anticipated in that position or line of work.
(4) Injuries arising out of employer-required or supplied travel to and from a remote
jobsite or activities performed at the direction or under the control of the employer.
(5) An injury caused by the willful act of a third person directed against an employee
because of the employee's employment.
(6) A mental or psychological condition that is physiologically caused by a physical
injury, but only when the physical injury is determined with reasonable medical

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 10
certainty to be at least fifty percent of the cause of the condition as compared with
all other contributing causes combined, and only when the condition did not
pre-exist the work injury. Other contributing causes include emotional circumstances
that generally accompany work - related injuries, including the loss of function, loss o f
sel f - esteem, loss of financial independence, divorce, loss of career or employmen t
position, disruption of lifestyle or family units, anxiousness, uncertainty, or
compromised ability to participate in a lifestyle, hobby, or pastime.
b. The term does not include:
(1) Ordinary diseases of life to which the general public outside of employment is
exposed or preventive treatment for communicable diseases, except the
organization may pay for preventive treatment for an exposure to a bloodborne
pathogen as defined in section 23-07.5-01 occurring in the course of employment
and for exposure to rabies occurring in the course of employment.
(2) A willfully self-inflicted injury, including suicide or attempted suicide, or an injury
caused by the employee's willful intention to injure or kill another.
(3) Any injury caused by the use of intoxicants, including recreational marijuana use, or
the illegal use of controlled substances.
(4) An injury that arises out of an altercation in which the injured employee is an
aggressor. This paragraph does not apply to public safety employees, including law
enforcement officers or private security personnel who are required to engage in
altercations as part of their job duties if the altercation arises out of the performance
of those job duties.
(5) An injury that arises out of an illegal act committed by the injured employee.
(6) An injury that arises out of an employee's voluntary nonpaid participation in any
recreational activity, including athletic events, parties, and picnics, even though the
employer pays some or all of the cost of the activity.
(7) Injuries attributable to a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, including
when the employment acts as a trigger to produce symptoms in the pre-existing
injury, disease, or other condition unless the employment substantially accelerates
its progression or substantially worsens its severity. Pain is a symptom and may be
considered in determining whether there is a substantial acceleration or substantial
worsening of a pre-existing injury, disease, or other condition, but pain alone is not a
substantial acceleration or a substantial worsening.
(8) A nonemployment injury that, although acting upon a prior compensable injury, is an
independent intervening cause of injury.
(9) A latent or asymptomatic degenerative condition, caused in substantial part by
employment duties, which is triggered or made active by a subsequent injury.
(10) A mental injury arising from mental stimulus.
12. "Date of first disability" means the first date the injured employee was unable to work because
of a compensable injury.
13. "Date of maximum medical improvement" or "date of maximum medical recovery" means the
date after which further recovery from, or lasting improvement to, an injury or disease can no
longer reasonably be anticipated based upon reasonable medical probability.
14. "Director" means the director of the organization.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 11
15. "Disability" means loss of actual earnings capacity and may be permanent total, temporary
total, or partial.
16. "Electronic means" means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless,
optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.
17. "Employee" means an individual who performs hazardous employment for another for
remuneration unless the individual is an independent contractor under the common-law test.
a. The term includes:
(1) All elective and appointed officials of this state and its political subdivisions,
including municipal corporations and including the members of the legislative
assembly, all elective officials of any county, and all elective peace officers of any
city.
(2) Aliens.
(3) Human service zone general assistance workers, except those who are engaged in
repaying to human service zones or the department of health and human services
moneys the human service zones or the department of health and human services
have been compelled by statute to expend for general assistance.
(4) Minors, whether lawfully or unlawfully employed. A minor is deemed sui juris for the
purposes of this title, and no other person has any claim for relief or right to claim
workforce safety and insurance benefits for any injury to a minor worker, but in the
event of the award of a lump sum of benefits to a minor employee, the lump sum
may be paid only to the legally appointed guardian of the minor.
b. The term does not include:
(1) An individual whose employment is both casual and not in the course of the trade,
business, profession, or occupation of that individual's employer.
(2) An individual who is engaged in an illegal enterprise or occupation.
(3) The spouse of an employer or the child under the age of twenty-two of an employer.
For purposes of this paragraph and section 65-07-01, "child" means any legitimate
child, stepchild, adopted child, foster child, or acknowledged illegitimate child.
(4) A real estate broker or real estate salesperson, provided the individual meets the
following three requirements:
(a) The salesperson or broker must be a licensed real estate agent under section
43-23-05.
(b) Substantially all of the salesperson's or broker's remuneration for the services
performed as a real estate agent must be directly related to sales or other
efforts rather than to the number of hours worked.
(c) A written agreement must exist between the salesperson or broker and the
person for which the salesperson or broker works, which agreement must
provide the salesperson or broker will not be treated as an employee but
rather as an independent contractor.
(5) The members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not
employed in any capacity by the corporation other than as members of the board of
directors.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 12
(6) An individual delivering newspapers or shopping news, if substantially all of the
individual's remuneration is directly related to sales or other efforts rather than to the
number of hours worked and a written agreement exists between the individual and
the publisher of the newspaper or shopping news which states the individual is an
independent contractor.
(7) An employer.
17.18. "Employer" means a person that engages or received the services of another for remuneration
unless the person performing the services is an independent contractor under the
common-law test. The term includes:
a. The state and all political subdivisions thereof.
b. All public and quasi-public corporations in this state.
c. Every person, partnership, limited liability company, association, and private corporation,
including a public service corporation.
d. The legal representative of any deceased employer.
e. The receiver or trustee of any person, partnership, limited liability company, association,
or corporation having one or more employees as herein defined.
f. The president, vice presidents, secretary, or treasurer of a business corporation, but not
members of the board of directors of a business corporation who are not also officers of
the corporation.
g. The managers of a limited liability company.
h. The president, vice presidents, secretary, treasurer, or board of directors of an
association or cooperative organized under chapter 6-06, 10-12, 10-13, 10-15, 36-08, or
49-21.
i. The clerk, assessor, treasurer, or any member of the board of supervisors of an
organized township, if the person is not employed by the township in any other capacity.
j. A multidistrict special education unit.
k. An area career and technology center.
l. A regional education association.
18.19. "Fee schedule" means the payment formulas established in the organization publication
entitled "Medical and Hospital Fees".
19.20. "Fund" means the workforce safety and insurance fund.
20.21. "Hazardous employment" means any employment in which one or more employees are
employed regularly in the same business or in or about the establishment except:
a. Agricultural or domestic service.
b. Any employment of a common carrier by railroad.
c. Any employment for the transportation of property or persons by nonresidents, where, in
such transportation, the highways are not traveled more than seven miles [11.27
kilometers] and return over the same route within the state of North Dakota.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 13
d. All members of the clergy and employees of religious organizations engaged in the
operation, maintenance, and conduct of the place of worship.
21.22. "Health care provider" means a doctor of medicine or osteopathy, chiropractor, dentist,
optometrist, podiatrist, or psychologist acting within the scope of the doctor's license, a
physical therapist, an advanced practice registered nurse, or a certified physician assistant.
22.23. "Medical marijuana" means the use of all parts of the plant of the genus cannabis, the seeds
of the plant, the resin extracted from any part of the plant, and every compound, manufacture,
salt, derivative, mixture, or preparation of the plant, the seeds of the plant, or the resin
extracted from any part of the plant as a physician-recommended form of medicine or herbal
therapy. The term does not include treatments or preparations specifically approved by the
United States food and drug administration as a drug product.
23.24. "Noncompliance" means failure to follow the requirements of chapter 65-04. An employer may
be in noncompliance regardless of the employer's insured or uninsured status with the
organization.
24.25. "Organization" means workforce safety and insurance, or the director, or any department
head, assistant, or employee of workforce safety and insurance designated by the director, to
act within the course and scope of that person's employment in administering the policies,
powers, and duties of this title.
25.26. "Parent" includes a stepparent and a parent by adoption.
26.27. "Payroll report" means the mechanism created by the organization and used by employers to
report all employee payroll required by the organization.
27.28. "Permanent impairment" means the loss of or loss of use of a member of the body existing
after the date of maximum medical improvement and includes disfigurement resulting from an
injury.
28.29. "Permanent total disability" means disability that is the direct result of a compensable injury
that prevents an injured employee from performing any work and results from any one of the
following conditions:
a. Total and permanent loss of sight of both eyes;
b. Loss of both legs or loss of both feet at or above the ankle;
c. Loss of both arms or loss of both hands at or above the wrist;
d. Loss of any two of the members or faculties in subdivision a, b, or c;
e. Permanent and complete paralysis of both legs or both arms or of one leg and one arm;
f. Third-degree burns that cover at least forty percent of the body and require grafting;
g. A medically documented brain injury affecting cognitive and mental functioning which
renders an injured employee unable to provide self-care and requires supervision or
assistance with a majority of the activities of daily living; or
h. A compensable injury that results in a permanent partial impairment rating of the whole
body of at least twenty-five percent pursuant to section 65-05-12.2.
If the injured employee has not reached maximum medical improvement within one hundred
four weeks, the injured employee may receive a permanent partial impairment rating if a rating
will assist the organization in assessing the injured employee's capabilities. Entitlement to a
rating is solely within the discretion of the organization.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 14
29.30. "Rehabilitation services" means nonmedical services reasonably necessary to restore a
disabled employee to substantial gainful employment as defined by section 65-05.1-01 as
near as possible. The term may include vocational evaluation, counseling, education,
workplace modification, vocational retraining including training for alternative employment with
the same employer, and job placement assistance.
30.31. "Seasonal employment" includes occupations that are not permanent or that do not
customarily operate throughout the entire year. Seasonal employment is determined by what
is customary with respect to the employer at the time of injury.
31.32. "Spouse" includes only the decedent's husband or wife who was living with the decedent or
was dependent upon the decedent for support at the time of injury.
32.33. "Subcontractor" means a person that agrees to perform all or part of the work for a contractor
or another subcontractor.
33.34. "Temporary total disability" means disability that results in the inability of an injured employee
to earn wages as a result of a compensable injury for which disability benefits may not exceed
a cumulative total of one hundred four weeks or the date the injured employee reaches
maximum medical improvement or maximum medical recovery, whichever occurs first.
34.35. "Uninsured" means failure of an employer to secure mandatory coverage with the organization
or failure to pay premium, assessment, penalty, or interest, as calculated by the organization,
which is more than forty-five days past due. An uninsured employer is subject to chapter
65-09.
35.36. "Utilization review" means the initial and continuing evaluation of appropriateness in terms of
both the level and the quality of health care and health services provided a patient, based on
medically accepted standards. The evaluation must be accomplished by means of a system
that identifies the utilization of medical services, based on medically accepted standards, and
which refers instances of possible inappropriate utilization to the organization to obtain
opinions and recommendations of expert medical consultants to review individual cases for
which administrative action may be deemed necessary.
36.37. "Valid functional capacities examination" means:
a. The results of a physical examination consisting of a battery of standardized
assessments that offer reliable results in performance-based measures and demonstrate
the level and duration an injured employee may return to work.
b. The conclusions of medical experts, following observations of other activities the medical
expert determines similarly predictive, when the results of the physical examination in
subdivision a are not obtained or reliable.
37.38. a. "Wages" means:
(1) An injured employee's remuneration from all employment reportable to the internal
revenue service as earned income for federal income tax purposes.
(2) For members of the national guard who sustain a compensable injury while on state
active duty, "wages" includes income from federal employment and may be included
in determining the average weekly wage.
(3) For purposes of chapter 65-04 only, "wages" means all gross earnings of all
employees. The term includes all pretax deductions for amounts allocated by the
employee for deferred compensation, medical reimbursement, retirement, or any
similar program, but may not include dismissal or severance pay.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 15
b. The organization may consider postinjury wages for which coverage was not required or
otherwise secured in North Dakota for purposes of determining appropriate vocational
rehabilitation options or entitlement to disability benefits under this title.
SECTION 2. AMENDMENT. Section 65-01-16 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
65-01-16. Decisions by organization - Disputed decisions.
The following procedures must be followed in claimsa claim for benefits, notwithstanding any
provisions to the contrary in chapter 28-32:
1. The organization shall send a copy of each initial claim form filed with the organization to the
claimant's employer, by regular mail or electronic means, along with a form for the employer's
response, if the employer's response has not been filed at the time the claim is filed.
2. The organization may conduct a hearing on any matter within its jurisdiction by informal
internal review of the information of record.
3. The organization may issue a notice of decision for any decision made by informal internal
review and shall serveissue the notice of decision on the parties by regular mail or electronic
means. A notice of decision must include a statement of the decision, a short summary of the
reason for the decision, and notice of the right to reconsideration.
4. A party has forty-five days from the day the notice of decision was mailedissued by the
organization by regular mail or electronic means to file a written request for reconsideration.
The request for reconsideration is considered filed only upon receipt by the organization. The
employer is not required to file the request through an attorney. The request must state the
reason for disagreement with the organization's decision and the desired outcome. The
request may be accompanied by additional evidence not previously submitted to the
organization. The organization shall reconsider the matter by informal internal review of the
information of record. Absent a timely and sufficient request for reconsideration, the notice of
decision is final and may not be reheard or appealed.
5. After receiving a request for reconsideration, the organization shall serve onissue to the
parties by regular mail or electronic means, a notice of decision reversing the previous
decision or, in accordance with the North Dakota Rules of Civil Procedure, an administrative
order that includes its findings, conclusions, and order. The organization may serveissue an
administrative order on any decision made by informal internal review without first issuing a
notice of decision and receiving a request for reconsideration. If the organization does not
issue an order within sixty days of receiving a request for reconsideration, any interested party
may request, and the organization shall promptly issue, an appealable determination.
6. An employee has forty-five days from the day the administrative order was mailed in which to
file a request for assistance from the decision review office under section 65-02-27.
7. A party has forty-five days, from the date of serviceissuance of an administrative order or from
the day the decision review office mailsissues its notice by regular mail or electronic means
that the office's assistance is complete, in which to file a written request for rehearing. The
request must specifically state each alleged error of fact and law to be reheard and the relief
sought. The request for rehearing is considered filed only upon receipt by the organization.
Absent a timely and sufficient request for rehearing, the administrative order is final and may
not be reheard or appealed.
8. Rehearings must be conducted as hearings under chapter 28-32 to the extent the provisions
of that chapter do not conflict with this section.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 16
9. A party may appeal a posthearing administrative order to district court in accordance with
chapter 65-10. Chapter 65-10 does not preclude the organization from appealing to district
court a final order issued by a hearing officer under this title.
10. Any notice of decision, administrative order, or posthearing administrative order is subject to
review and reopening under section 65-05-04.
SECTION 3. AMENDMENT. Section 65-02-27 of the North Dakota Century Code is amended and
reenacted as follows:
65-02-27. Decision review office.
The organization's decision review office is established. The decision review office is independent
of the claims department of the organization and activities administered through the office must be
administered in accordance with this title. The decision review office shall provide assistance to an
injured employee who has filed a claim, which may include acting on behalf of an injured employee who
is aggrieved by a decision of the organization, communicating with organization staff regarding claim
dispute resolution, and informing an injured employee of the effect of decisions made by the
organization, an injured employee, or an employer under this title. The organization shall employ a
director of the decision review office and other personnel determined to be necessary for the
administration of the office. An individual employed to administer the decision review office may not act
as an attorney for an injured employee. The organization may not pay attorney's fees to an attorney
who represents an injured employee in a disputed claim before the organization unless the injured
employee has first attempted to resolve the dispute through the decision review office. A written request
for assistance by an injured employee who contacts the decision review office within the period for
requesting a hearing on an administrative order tolls the time period for requesting a hearing on that
order. The period begins upon notice to the injured employee, sentissued by regular mail or electronic
means, that the decision review office's assistance to the injured employee is completed. The
information contained in a file established by the decision review office on an injured employee's
disputed claim, including communications from an injured employee, is privileged and may not be
released without the injured employee's permission. Information in the file containing the notes or
mental impressions of decision review office staff is confidential and may not be released by the
decision review office.
SECTION 4. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 65-05-17 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. To the decedent's spouse or to the guardian of the children of the decedent, an amount equal
to the benefit rate for total disability under section 65-05-09. All recipients of benefits under
this subsection are eligible for benefits at the rate provided in this section, regardless of the
date of death of the deceased employee. These benefits continue until the death of the
decedent's spouse; or, if the surviving children of the decedent are under the care of a
guardian, until those children no longer meet the definition of child in this title. If there is more
than one guardian for the children who survive the decedent, the organization shall divide the
death benefits equally among the children and shall pay benefits to the children's guardians.
Total death benefits, including supplementary benefits, paid on any one claim may not exceed
three hundred thousandfour hundred thousand dollars.
SECTION 5. AMENDMENT. Subsection 4 of section 65-05-20.1 of the North Dakota Century Code
is amended and reenacted as follows:
4. The total amount awarded annually in scholarships may not exceed five hundred thousand
dollars. The maximum amount payable on behalf of an applicant is ten thousandtwelve
thousand five hundred dollars per year for no more than five years, except that the combined
retraining and scholarship periods for applicants successfully completing a rehabilitation
program under subdivision g of subsection 4 of section 65-05.1-01 may not exceed five years.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 17
SECTION 6. APPLICATION. Section 1 of this Act, except for the amendment to paragraph 6 of
subdivision a of subsection 11 of section 65-01-02, applies to claims for indemnity benefits filed on or
after August 1, 2025. The amendment to paragraph 6 of subdivision a of subsection 11 of section
65-01-02 applies to all claims regardless of date of injury. The increase in the death benefit cap from
$300,000 to $400,000 in section 4 of this Act applies to employee deaths resulting from injuries that
occur on or after the effective date of this Act.

S. B. NO. 2109 - PAGE 18
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2109.
Senate Vote: Yeas 45 Nays 2 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 70 Nays 20 Absent 4
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State